Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2510
Registration of conveyances; when required.

Conveyances upon which construction is started subsequent to January 1, 2008, shall be registered at the time they are completed and placed in service.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 10.